Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8206
Basic level rehabilitation center, defined.

Basic level rehabilitation center means a rehabilitation center which provides services to individuals with musculoskeletal injuries, peripheral nerve injuries, uncomplicated lower extremity amputations, and other diagnoses resulting in functional impairment in one or more functional areas with minimum to moderate impairment or complexity and provides physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech-language pathology services.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 6.